Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2621
Common carrier; unstamped cigarettes; bond; conditions; permit; fee.

Any common carrier of merchandise owning or operating any railroad, express company, bus, truck, or other transportation line or routes for the transportation of merchandise in the State of Nebraska, upon application and filing of a bond in form and penalty and with such sureties as may be approved by the Tax Commissioner, may be designated as a carrier of unstamped cigarettes from any bonded warehouse to a licensed wholesale tobacco dealer in the State of Nebraska, and a carrier's permit shall be issued by the Tax Commissioner upon receipt of a fee of ten dollars. One of the conditions of such bond shall be that the bonded carrier shall be liable to the State of Nebraska in an amount equal to the tax due on the quantity of cigarettes consigned to the licensed tobacco dealer.

Laws 1951, c. 255, § 1, p. 876;

Laws 1982, LB 928, § 64.